Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201452-1203
Lien; date of attachment; enforcement.

A lien created under section 52-1201 shall attach on the date of filing
and time thereof if shown. Such lien shall be treated in all respects as an
agricultural lien as provided in article 9, Uniform Commercial Code, and may
be enforced in the manner and form provided for the enforcement of secured
transactions as provided in article 9, Uniform Commercial Code. Effective January 1, 2015, this section
applies to a lien created under section 52-1201 regardless of when the lien
was created.

Laws 1985, LB 503, § 3;

Laws 1999, LB 550, § 30;

Laws 2001, LB 54, § 20;

Laws 2014, LB750, § 12.
April 11, 2014